Utah statutes.
53-7-307.   Duties of the division.

The division shall:

(1)  prescribe the method and form to apply for a LPG license, with the approval of the board;

(2)  investigate the experience, reputation, and background of applicants;

(3)  recommend to the board issuing, suspending, revoking, and denying licenses;

(4)  assist the board in conducting hearings in connection with the applications for, or revocation of, licenses;

(5)  submit to the governor a biennial report before September 1 of each even-numbered year, covering the board's transactions during the biennium ending June 30 of that year, including a complete statement of the receipts and expenditures of the board during that period;

(6)  keep accurate records and minutes of all meetings, which shall be open to public inspection at all reasonable times, and keep a public record of all applications for licenses and licenses issued by the board;

(7)  conduct examinations of every license applicant to determine the responsibility, ability, knowledge, experience, or other qualifications of the applicant for a license;

(8)  require competency testing for all employees and subcontractors of licensees engaged in transporting or dispensing LPG or installing, servicing, or repairing an LPG fueling or carburetion system under this part;

(9)  prepare applications, collect fees, and issue licenses for any facility that handles LPG;

(10)  provide for or direct the inspection of the site of any facility that stores, dispenses, services, or handles LPG;

(11)  provide inspections to any facility where a qualified authority does not exist; and

(12)  prepare and administer examinations, collect fees, and issue LPG certificates to personnel who handle or work with LPG.

